Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6413.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 12c. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters I and II of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, within chapter 257 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 257.233a(7) Pub ord G Odometer tampering 5 257.254 Property E Possessing stolen vehicle title 10 750.256b(1)(b) Pub tst F Certain prohibited uses of automatic license plate reader - second or subsequent offense 4 750.256b(2)(b) Pub trst F Certain prohibited activities with respect to automatic license plate readers - second or subsequent offense 4 750.256b(3)(b) Pub trst F Sharing, selling, or otherwise distributing captured license plate data for a commercial purpose - second or subsequent offense 4 750.256b(4)(b) Pub trst F License plate data retention violation - second or subsequent offense 4 257.257(1) Property G Altering or forging vehicle documents â first offense 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 257.257(2) Property G Altering or forging vehicle documents â second offense 7 257.257(3) Property E Altering or forging vehicle documents â third or subsequent offense 15 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 6411 (request no. H07393'26). (b) House Bill No. 6412 (request no. H07934'26).